Washington statutes.
RCW 15.15.020

Violation or threatened violation of chapter—Action to enjoin.

The director of the department of agriculture may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule made pursuant to this chapter in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur.

[ 1997 c 176 s 3.]